devtools/spelling_dict/synced_nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2016 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


!! !!!Inari Saami noun roots





LEXICON NounRoot !
 Noun ;
 FirstComponent ;
! HyphNouns ;

!! !!1. Even-syllable stems
!! * â-stems
!! * á-stems
!! * o-stems
!! * a-stems
!! * ä-stems
!! * e-stems
!! * i stems
!! * u stems
!! * Four-syllabic even stems
!! * 2.1 Stems without consonant gradation
!! * 2.1.1 2nd syll vowel does not alternate (MO Ia)
!! * 2.1.2 2nd syll vowel alternates (MO Ib)
!! * 2.2 Stems without consonant gradation
!! 3. Ohter cases, all kind of changes

! Tehtävä:
! Jokainen sana pitää olla vain kerran, esim. yksi aabis, yksi aaigâ.
! surutta poistaa jos sanalla on toinen leksikko.
! Käännökset ovat tietysti hauskoja, ne voidaan säilyttää
! Muuten voi laittaa jatkoleksikon mielen mukaan, tärkeä on poistaa dubletit.


! Work with miniparadigms
! The 

! asdfasdf These words already have miniparadigms
! Correct order is com, loc, ill, gen

LEXICON LastNouns
heivi+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpNP/Suff+Sem/Dummytag:he^RVi4vi 2AIGI ;

!LEXICON MaleRelative
!čeeci:čeec^RCi 2CAACI ;

LEXICON MiddleNouns !!= * __@CODE@__
njune+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Hum:njun Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
njälmi+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Body:njälm Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
uáivi+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Body_Plc-elevate:uáiv Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
jyelgi+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Body:jyelg Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
jävri+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Plc-water:jävr Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
vääri+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Plc-elevate:vär Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
juuhâ+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Plc:juv Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
juuhâ+N+Cmp/Sh+Use/NG+Sem/Plc:juh Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
kyeli+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Ani-fish:kyel Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
njargâ+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Plc:njarg Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
vuonâ+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Plc:vuon Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
čielgi+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Body:čielg Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
keđgi+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Obj:keđg Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
kietâ+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Body:kiet Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
pottâ+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Body:pott Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
paje+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Event_Time:pai Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
peeci+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Plant:pec Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
kuoškâ+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Plc:kuošk Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
luohtâ+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Plc:luoht Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
pieggâ+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Substnc_Wthr:piegg Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
kuáti+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Build:kuát Rnoun ; ! tags_via_apertium
pohe+N+Cmp/Sh+Sem/Dummytag:poh Rnoun ;



LEXICON NAMAG !!= * __@CODE@__ gives »»» and directs to NAMAG, both from adj and numerals
+Cmp+Sem/Dummytag#:»»# NAMAGCont ;
!#:»»# NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;

LEXICON SAS !!= * __@CODE@__ , both from adj and numerals
+Cmp+Sem/Dummytag#:»»# SASCont ;

 
LEXICON NAMAGCont!!= * __@CODE@__
tääsi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Plc:tááság DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
čiehâ+Sem/Plc:čievâg DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
jienâ+Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon:jienâg DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
lonnjâ+Sem/Buildpart:loonjâg DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
čuárvi+Sem/Body_Mat:čuárvág DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
uáivi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Body_Plc-elevate:uáivág DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
njälmi+Sem/Body:njáálmág DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
kerdi+Sem/Plc_Time:kiärdág DER-AG ; ! tags_via_apertium
+Der+Der/ivvaas+Sem/Dummytag:ivvá A_VUALAAS ;

LEXICON SASCont!!= * __@CODE@__ ,
ihe+Sem/Time:ihás DER-SAS ; ! tags_via_apertium
ihe+Sem/Time+Err/Orth:ihas DER-SAS ; ! tags_via_apertium
ihe+Sem/Time:»»»-ihás DER-SAS ;
peivi+Sem/Time:piäivás DER-SAS ; ! tags_via_apertium
kerdi+Sem/Plc_Time:kiärdás DER-SAS ; ! tags_via_apertium
kerdi:»»»-kiärdás DER-SAS ;
jienâ+Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon:jienâs DER-SAS ; ! tags_via_apertium
tääsi+Sem/Plc:tásás DER-SAS ;  ! ollâtásásâš tags_via_apertium
nummeer+Sem/Sign:»»»-nummeers DER-SAS ;
suormâräigi+Sem/Dummytag:»»»-suormâráigás DER-SAS ;
kiilu+Sem/Measr:»»»-kilus DER-SAS ;
sentti+Sem/Measr:»»»-senttis DER-SAS ;


LEXICON Gen_DER   !!= * ''@CODE@'' 
+Der1+Der/lasj:l ANOLASJ ; 
+Der1+Der/lasj+Err/Orth:ll ANOLASJ ; ! historjállâš
!+Der+Der/vualasas:#-vuálás ANOLASJ ; ! Compounding better way: gen+vuálásâš
+Der1+Der/Car:tt MUSTOTTEM ; 

LEXICON Nom_DER   !!= * ''@CODE@'' 
+Der1+Der/lasj+Use/NG:l ANOLASJ ; ! XXX not at all? Trond


LEXICON DER-AG  !!= * ''@CODE@'' 
+N+Der+Der/ag:  PASTEL ; !+N because of redirection from numeral-file

LEXICON DER-SAS  !!= * ''@CODE@'' 
+N+Der2+Der/sasj:  ANOLASJ ; !+N because of redirection from numeral-file


!! !!The split into different noun types according to Px

LEXICON Noun !!= * __@CODE@__ is split into NounNoPx, NounPxKin, NounPx.
            NounNoPx ;  !!= ** __@CODE@__ No flag, no Px
@P.Px.add@  NounPxKin ; !!= ** __@CODE@__ TODO: add a flag @P.Nom3Px.add@ when we know how it works
@P.Px.add@  NounPx ;    !!= ** __@CODE@__ with a @P.Px.add@ flag, and with Px (= most nouns)

LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * __@CODE@__ move here the nouns not taking Px.
akselkoskâ+Sem/Dummytag:aksel#ko^RVskâ 2ALGA "akseliväli" ;
huksimlävdikodde+Sem/Dummytag:huksim#lävdi#ko^RVdde 2ALGE "rakennuslautakunta" ;
kielâlävdikodde+Sem/Org:kielâ#lävdi#ko^RVdde 2ALGE "kielilautakunta" ; ! tags_via_apertium
herskutatti+Sem/Plant-fungus:hersku#ta^RVtti 2KUMPPI "herkkutatti" ;
! px-less nouns should be moved from NounPx to NounNoPx (i.e., here)

LEXICON NounPxKin !!= * __@CODE@__For the moment, kinship words go like NounPx and need not be moved here.
eeči+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Hum:eeč^RCi 2CAACI ;	!YAML ¢eijijn, eejist, iäčán, eeji tags_via_apertium
enni+Sem/Hum:e^RVnni 2AIGI "emo" ;	! tags_via_apertium
viljâ+Sem/Hum:vi^RVljâ 2ALGA "veli" ; !¢viljáin, viiljâst, viiljân, viiljâ tags_via_apertium
! Do not move kinship terms here yet.


!! !!The standard list of noun stems

!! The nouns are reverse-sorted according to contlex,
!! and thereafter according to stem.

LEXICON NounPx !!= * __@CODE@__ here we put all normal nouns, as before
sijđo+Sem/Txt:»»»-sijđos DER-SAS ;
